Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.100

Overruling motion—Pleading over.

If the motion to set aside the indictment [or information] be denied, the defendant must immediately answer the indictment or information, either by demurring or pleading thereto.

[ 1891 c 28 s 52; Code 1881 s 1048; RRS s 2102.]